Utah statutes.
62A-3-201.   Legislative findings -- Purpose -- Ombudsman.
The Legislature finds and declares that the aging citizens of this state
should be assisted in asserting their civil and human rights as patients,
residents, and clients of long-term care facilities created to serve their
specialized needs and problems; and that for the health, safety, and welfare
of these citizens, the state should take appropriate action through an
adequate legal framework to address their difficulties.
The purpose of this part is to establish within the division the long-term
care ombudsman program for the aging citizens of this state and identify
duties and responsibilities of that program and of the ombudsman, in order to
address problems relating to long-term care for aging citizens, and to fulfill
federal requirements.
